Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-202.03
Watercourses; obstructions; cost; special assessment.

The county board, upon receipt of a request pursuant to section 31-202.02, may, if the board finds natural flow is being obstructed, cause the natural watercourse to be cleaned out. The cost thereof shall be levied as a special assessment and apportioned among the property owners specially benefited thereby and collected in the same manner as special assessments are levied and collected for drainage improvements under sections 31-121 to 31-124.

Laws 1951, c. 95, § 3, p. 264;

Laws 1972, LB 1053, § 2;

Laws 2015, LB361, § 49.